Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.500

Outstanding indebtedness not affected.

When any portion of a fire protection district is annexed by or incorporated into a code city, any outstanding indebtedness, bonded or otherwise, shall remain an obligation of the taxable property annexed or incorporated as if the annexation or incorporation had not occurred.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.500.]